Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Department of Kentucky State Police

16.010.
Definitions for KRS 16.010 to 16.199.

As used in KRS

16.010

to

16.199

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means the Department of Kentucky State Police Personnel Board;

“Cabinet” means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

“Cadet Trooper” means an applicant for employment as an officer who is selected by the commissioner to attend the department training program, and who is employed as a trainee;

“Civilian” means experts, statisticians, clerks, and other assistants who are not peace officers;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police;

“Continuous service” for participation in and eligibility for the promotional process for each rank of officer commissioned under this chapter means:

For sergeant, service as a commissioned Kentucky State Police officer that has not been interrupted by actual separation from the department, whether in the form of resignation, retirement, or termination;

For lieutenant, service in grade as a sergeant that has not been interrupted by actual separation from the department, whether in the form of resignation, retirement, termination, or by demotion in accordance with KRS

16.140

; and

For captain, service in grade as lieutenant that has not been interrupted by actual separation from the department, whether in the form of resignation, retirement, termination, or by demotion in accordance with KRS

16.140

;

“CVE R Class” means any retired Kentucky State Police commercial vehicle enforcement officer commissioned under KRS

16.187

who has become reemployed with the department on a contractual basis pursuant to KRS

16.196

to

16.199

;

“Department” means the Department of Kentucky State Police;

“Officer” means any member of the Department of Kentucky State Police, other than an individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, who possesses the powers of a peace officer;

“Secretary” means the secretary of Justice and Public Safety Cabinet; and

“Trooper R Class” means any retired Kentucky State Police officer commissioned under this chapter who has become reemployed with the department on a contractual basis pursuant to KRS

16.196

to

16.199

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 1; 1952, ch. 57, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 22; 1976, ch. 299, § 4; 2005, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 56, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 59, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 8, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 110, § 6, effective July 15, 2016; 2016 ch. 109, § 5, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2016). This statute was amended in 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 5 and ch. 110, sec. 6. 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 15 provided that ch. 110 takes precedence over ch. 109. Chapter 110 was also the later-passed bill. Therefore, 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 6 has been codified and 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 5 has not.

(6/25/2009). A reference in the lead-in language of this statute to “KRS

16.010

to

16.185

and Sections 12 to 15 of this Act” in 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 59, sec. 1, has been changed in codification to “ KRS

16.010

to

16.199

,” to account for newly created statutes in 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 75, secs. 1 to
10, and
2009 Ky. Acts ch. 59, secs. 12 to 15, all of which have been assigned numbers in KRS Chapter 16 within that range of statutes.

(1/1/2006). 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 60, sec. 3, states that the amendments to this statute made in 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 60, sec. 1, “shall only apply to the 2006 Kentucky State Police sworn promotional process and any sworn promotional processes thereafter.”

16.020.
Department of State Police created; appointment of commissioner as head. [Repealed.]

16.030.
Qualifications of commissioner.

The commissioner shall be more than twenty-eight (28) years of age; shall be a citizen of the United States; and shall be selected on the basis of training, experience and qualifications for this position and preferably shall have at least five (5) years experience in public or police administration.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 3; 1952, ch. 57, § 6; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. X, § 5; 1966, ch. 255, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 23; 1976, ch. 299, § 5.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Deputy heads of state departments, appointment and compensation, KRS

12.040

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Breckinridge, Law Enforcement in Kentucky, Report to the Committee on the Administration of Justice in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, Part IX, State Police, 52 Ky. L.J. 1 (1963).

16.040.
Organization of department — Qualifications of officers — Investigation of applicants.

The department shall consist of the commissioner and the number of officers, individuals employed as a Trooper R Class, CVE R Class, and civilians, and shall be organized in the manner as the commissioner from time to time determines.

All persons appointed as officers shall at the time of their appointment:

Be not less than twenty-one (21) years of age;

Be of good moral character, and in good health;

Be citizens of the United States and residents of the Commonwealth; and

Possess;

A minimum of sixty (60) hours of credit, or an associate degree, from an accredited college or university;

A high school diploma with at least two (2) years’ experience in the military or in law enforcement; or

A high school diploma or General Educational Development (GED) diploma with additional experience established by the commissioner by administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. However, any person appointed under this subparagraph who has not completed the requirements of subparagraph 1. of this paragraph prior to the end of probation as described in KRS 16.140(11) shall be discharged.

The commissioner shall prescribe minimum physical requirements for appointment as an officer of the department and for individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, and shall conduct such tests and require such physical examinations as deemed necessary to determine the fitness and qualification of each applicant. All other qualifications being equal, preference shall be given to veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States in time of war, who were honorably discharged.

The commissioner shall direct an investigation to be conducted in order to determine an applicant’s suitability for employment as an officer. The contents of the investigation shall be subject to the Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

and KRS

61.991

, except that the identity of any witness or informant involving information relative to this investigation shall remain confidential. The identity of any witness or informant shall be subject to the subpoena power of a court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 4; 1966, ch. 255, § 11; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(3) and (6); 1994, ch. 437, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 80, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2009, ch. 59, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 9, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 186, § 2, effective April 11, 2017; 2018 ch. 146, § 1, effective April 10, 2018.

Opinions of Attorney General.

“Pro tanto” credit, one year of high school credit for each year of experience in police administration or law enforcement, should not be given per se, but whether such credit should be given should be determined on a case by case basis in the sound discretion of the commissioner subject to appeal to the board under KRS 16.050(8).

OAG 68-249

.

Regulation of board requiring all applicants for trooper to possess a high school diploma and a certificate of their credits is unauthorized and invalid as it would be in conflict with the mandate of KRS 16.040(2)(d).

OAG 68-249

.

502 KAR 45:065 Section (5) which mandates absolute confidentiality as to investigations conducted by the State Police to determine an applicant’s suitability for employment, modifies and vitiates the terms of this section which directs disclosure of the contents of the investigation, with the narrow exception of the identities of witnesses and informants, specifically referencing the Open Records Act, and since 502 KAR 45:065 Section (5) and this section cannot be reconciled, the statute controls. 97-ORD-136.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Organization of state departments generally, KRS

12.060

.

16.045.
Appointment of deputy commissioner.

The commissioner may appoint a deputy commissioner. The appointee shall have peace officer authority only if that appointee is a current or honorably retired member of the Kentucky State Police.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 6, § 9, effective March 30, 2016.

16.050.
Appointment and compensation of personnel — Department of Kentucky State Police Personnel Board — Organization, duties, and compensation — Repayment of training costs.

The commissioner shall appoint or promote to the ranks and grades and positions of the department such officers as are considered by him or her to be necessary for the efficient administration of the department. The Kentucky State Police shall conduct a biennial salary survey, and the findings of the salary survey shall be included in the department’s budget request submitted to the Kentucky General Assembly.

All initial appointments of officers to the department shall be made for merit and fitness after a competitive examination.

There is created a Department of Kentucky State Police Personnel Board consisting of the commissioner and four (4) other members to be appointed by the Governor, two (2) to be appointed from each of the two (2) major political parties.

The initial appointment of members of the board shall be for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), and four (4) years. Thereafter each appointment shall be for a term of four (4) years, except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of a term shall be appointed for the remainder of that term.

Members of the board may be removed by the Governor only for cause, after being given a copy of charges against them and an opportunity to be heard publicly on such charges before the Governor.

The board shall elect one (1) of its members chairman. It shall meet at such time and place as shall be specified by call of the commissioner. Three (3) members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Members of the board other than the commissioner shall receive compensation of fifty dollars ($50) and reimbursement of travel expenses for each meeting of the board which they attend.

The board shall promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the purposes herein, which shall include provisions for:

Open competitive examination as to fitness of applicants for employment as officers; and

Establishment of eligible lists as a result of such competitive examinations, from which lists vacancies shall be filled.

The board shall hear appeals from applicants for employment for which examinations are being given or have been conducted and from eligibles on examination registers subject to the procedural rules which the board may adopt pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Prior to appointment as a Cadet Trooper, all applicants shall agree in writing that if, within three (3) years of completing the basic training course offered by the department, he or she accepts employment as a peace officer with another law enforcement agency, or accepts employment with another type of agency or entity in a position that requires law enforcement training to meet the qualifications for the position, he or she will repay to the department the cost incurred by the department in providing training to the officer to the extent repayment has not been made by the agency with which the officer accepts employment under paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection.

If the officer accepts employment as a peace officer with another state agency or a state university or educational institution within Kentucky within three (3) years of completing the basic training course offered by the department, the agency, university, or educational institution shall reimburse the department for costs incurred in providing training to the officer.

If the officer accepts employment with a city, county, or other local law enforcement agency within Kentucky within three (3) years of completing the basic training course offered by the department, KRS

70.290

shall apply as well, except that the amount of the reimbursement shall not be prorated as provided in KRS

70.290

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 5; 1952, ch. 57, § 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 12; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4), 25; 1978, ch. 154, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 344, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 154, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 57, effective June 26, 2007; 2016 ch. 110, § 8, effective July 15, 2016; 2016 ch. 109, § 7, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2016). This statute was amended in 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 7 and ch. 110, sec. 8. 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 15 provided that ch. 110 takes precedence over ch. 109. Chapter 110 was also the later-passed bill. Therefore, 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 8 has been codified and 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 7 has not.

A technical correction has been made in this section by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to

7.136

.

16.052.
Salary schedules for Kentucky State Police Officers.

The base compensation of troopers and commercial vehicle enforcement officers shall be determined based on years of service and rank, as provided in this section.

The years-of-service requirements for the salary schedule for ranks below sergeant are as follows:

A trooper and a commercial vehicle enforcement officer shall have less than three (3) years of continuous service as a commissioned trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer with the department;

A senior trooper and a senior commercial vehicle enforcement officer shall have:

At least three (3) years of continuous service as a commissioned trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer with the department and sixty (60) college credit hours;

At least four (4) years of continuous service as a commissioned trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer with the department and thirty-two (32) college credit hours; or

Five (5) years of continuous service as a commissioned trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer with the department with no college credit requirement;

A trooper first class and a commercial vehicle enforcement officer first class shall have at least ten (10) years of continuous service as a commissioned trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer with the department; and

A master trooper and a master commercial vehicle enforcement officer shall have at least fifteen (15) years of continuous service as a commissioned trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer with the department.

In addition to meeting the years of service requirements established by paragraph (a) of this subsection, troopers and commercial vehicle enforcement officers listed in the salary schedule for troopers and commercial vehicle enforcement officers below the rank of sergeant shall also meet the requirements for promotion in rank established by the commissioner pursuant to KRS

16.050

.

Requirements for promotion to sergeant, lieutenant, and captain are as established by KRS

16.055

.

Any overtime and any salary supplement received from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program pursuant to KRS

15.410

to

15.510

or any comparable supplements received from another funding source shall be in addition to the amounts reflected in the base salary schedules established by subsection (4) of this section.

The salary schedules established in this subsection are based on a combination of trooper and commercial vehicle enforcement officer classification and years of service.

When “NA” appears in the schedule, it is not possible for a trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer to be in that classification and years- of-service combination based upon statutory or regulatory conditions established for promotion or advancement.

Salary increases based on years of service shall be effective on the first day of the month during which the anniversary of the trooper’s or commercial vehicle enforcement officer’s appointment as a commissioned Kentucky State Police officer falls.

Salary increases based on promotion to a higher rank shall be effective on the first day the trooper and commercial vehicle enforcement officer is promoted.

If a trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer is reverted to a previous rank, the trooper’s or commercial vehicle enforcement officer’s salary shall be adjusted to the salary reflected in the base salary schedule for the trooper’s or commercial vehicle enforcement officer’s applicable number of years of service and rank. The adjustment shall take effect the first pay period following the pay period in which the reversion occurs.

The base salary for a cadet trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer cadet shall be forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000).

The salary for a legislative security specialist, as established in KRS

16.187

and

16.188

, shall be the equivalent of the base salary for a trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer with the same number of years of service.

Base salary schedule for ranks below sergeant

The base salary for ranks defined in KRS

16.055

and

16.191

shall be set at:

Ten percent (10%) above the base salary for the trooper’s or commercial vehicle enforcement officer’s applicable number of years of service for the rank of sergeant;

Twenty percent (20%) above the base salary for the trooper’s or commercial vehicle enforcement officer’s applicable number of years of service for the rank of lieutenant; and

Thirty percent (30%) above the base salary for the trooper’s or commercial vehicle enforcement officer’s applicable number of years of service for the rank of captain.

Beginning on July 1, 2023, the salary schedule established by subsection (4) of this section shall be adjusted annually to incorporate any increase in the nonseasonally adjusted Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, all items, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

The salary schedules shall be applied to troopers and commercial vehicle enforcement officers employed by the department on July 1, 2022, as follows:

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection:

Any trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer whose base salary exceeds the amount established for his or her years of service and rank in subsection (4) of this section shall retain his or her base salary and shall not receive an increase under the salary schedule until the trooper’s or commercial vehicle enforcement officer’s years of service and rank require a higher base salary than the base salary he or she was receiving on July 1, 2022; and

Any trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer whose base salary is below the amount established for his or her years of service and rank in subsection (4) of this section shall receive the base salary he or she qualifies for under the salary schedule for the pay period beginning July 1, 2022; and

Any trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer who is receiving compensation under KRS

16.165

shall not receive any years of service or rank increases during any period that he or she is receiving compensation under KRS

16.165

.

The commissioner may establish additional ranks beyond those provided in the salary schedules established by this section, including the ranks of major, lieutenant colonel, colonel, and executive security detail. If the commissioner establishes any of these ranks, the commissioner shall set forth in a policy the conditions under which a trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer may be promoted to the rank, and the salary that the trooper or commercial vehicle enforcement officer will receive while serving in that rank.

Years of Service Trooper Salary Steps Based on Rank Trooper Senior First Class Master Base Pay $55,888.80 N/A N/A N/A 3 years $59,583.12 $61,422.00 N/A N/A 5 years N/A $62,719.20 N/A N/A 7 years N/A $64,053.12 N/A N/A 9 years N/A $65,428.08 N/A N/A 10 years N/A N/A $65,723.76 N/A 13 years N/A N/A $68,368.08 N/A 15 years N/A N/A N/A $74,742.00 17 years N/A N/A N/A $77,837.04 19 years N/A N/A N/A $81,116.88 21 years N/A N/A N/A $84,499.20 23 years N/A N/A N/A $88,081.20 25 years N/A N/A N/A $88,834.56 27 years N/A N/A N/A $89,594.16 29 years N/A N/A N/A $90,361.68

Click to view

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 110, § 7, effective July 15, 2016; enacted by 2016 ch. 109, § 6, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 186, § 3, effective April 11, 2017; 2022 ch. 181, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2016). This statute was proposed to be created in
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 6 and
ch. 110, sec. 7.
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 15 provided that ch. 110 takes precedence over ch. 109. Chapter 110 was also the later-passed bill. Therefore,
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 7 has been codified and
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 6 has not.

16.055.
Promotions — Terms and conditions.

Promotions to sergeant within the department shall be on the following terms and conditions:

The applicant must have served six (6) years of continuous service as a commissioned State Police officer to be eligible for promotion to sergeant;

The applicant may be excluded from promotion eligibility by the commissioner for up to thirty-six (36) months on the basis of substantiated misconduct, as set forth in department policy;

Promotions shall be based on cumulative scores computed from twenty-five percent (25%) on personnel performance evaluation, thirty percent (30%) on job simulation examination, and forty-five percent (45%) on a written examination on which the applicant achieved at least a minimum score as determined by the commissioner in consultation with the Kentucky State Police Promotional Review Board;

The promotional list shall be valid for one (1) year, shall consist of the numerical scores and rankings of each applicant, and promotions shall be made in consecutive order beginning with the highest numerical ranking to fill an interim vacancy. When two (2) or more applicants receive the same numerical score, the order of placement on the list shall be determined by seniority of service. Upon the determination of a new numerical ranking following a new examination, all previous rankings shall be null and void;

The written examination shall be prepared and administered by an individual designated by the commissioner. The materials and textbooks will be selected by the commissioner and his or her staff. The commissioner will inform all applicants at least three (3) months prior to the examination date of the exact material from which test questions will be taken and the minimum score required to be eligible for placement on the promotional list;

The written test shall be administered to all applicants at the same time. Immediately upon completion of the written test the applicant will receive his or her numerical score. Such numerical score shall remain valid for a period of two (2) years following the date of examination unless the source material upon which the test is based is changed by more than thirty percent (30%), provided that the numerical score meets or exceeds the minimum score set in paragraph (e) of this subsection for the current year’s promotional list;

The job simulation examination shall be evaluated by boards designated by the commissioner consisting of the commissioner or his or her designated appointee not lower than rank of captain, an officer from another police agency of the rank equal to the position for which the applicant is competing, an instructor from an accredited law enforcement education program, a personnel director from private industry, and an officer from the Kentucky State Police of the rank equal to the position for which the applicant is competing;

The designated job simulation examination boards will perform all evaluations under guidelines developed and approved by the commissioner; and

Personnel evaluations shall be made by the appropriate supervisory personnel under procedures established and approved by the commissioner.

Promotions from sergeant to lieutenant within the department shall be on the same terms and conditions as promotions to sergeant. In addition, any applicant for lieutenant must have completed at least one (1) year of continuous service in grade as sergeant.

Promotions from lieutenant to captain within the department shall be on the same terms and conditions as promotions to lieutenant. In addition, any applicant for captain must have completed at least one (1) year of continuous service in grade as lieutenant.

The department will develop and administer only one (1) test for each of the above ranks. All eligible applicants will be permitted to participate in the promotional process to the next highest position of responsibility wherever a vacancy exists.

Officers promoted to rank of sergeant, lieutenant, or captain shall serve a probationary period for one (1) year of continuous service from the effective date of their promotions, and may be reverted to their previous rank with or without cause at any time during this period. If reverted to a previous rank, an individual is ineligible for promotion the next time the promotional process is offered.

The provisions of KRS

16.140

to the contrary notwithstanding, all ranks above the grade of captain are temporary and shall not be subject to the provisions for selection and promotion as required herein. All officers in such temporary positions shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and shall revert to their previous permanent rank upon the termination of their temporary appointment.

The total number of supervisory officers of all classifications shall be limited to a ratio not to exceed one (1) supervisor for every five (5) nonsupervisory officers.

No officer of the department, other than temporary positions above the rank of captain, shall be promoted to the next highest rank without competing with other officers as prescribed by this promotional procedure.

There shall be no discrimination based on race, sex, age, national origin, color,religion, creed, or political affiliation with respect to the department promotional system. All personnel actions are to be based solely on merit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 39, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 1; 2003, ch. 133, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 60, § 2, effective January 1, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 58, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 59, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2016 ch. 6, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 194, § 2, effective April 9, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2006).
2005 Ky. Acts ch. 60, sec. 3, states that the amendments to this statute made in
2005 Ky. Acts ch. 60, sec. 2, “shall only apply to the 2006 Kentucky State Police sworn promotional process and any sworn promotional processes thereafter.”

16.060.
Powers and duties of commissioner and officers. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

It shall be the duty of the commissioner, each officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class to detect and prevent crime, apprehend criminals, maintain law and order throughout the state, to collect, classify and maintain information useful for the detection of crime and the identification, apprehension and conviction of criminals and to enforce the criminal, as well as the motor vehicle and traffic laws of the Commonwealth. To this end the commissioner, each officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class is individually vested with the powers of a peace officer and shall have in all parts of the state the same powers with respect to criminal matters and enforcement of the laws relating thereto as sheriffs, constables and police officers in their respective jurisdictions, and shall possess all the immunities and matters of defense now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs, constables and police officers in any suit brought against them in consequence of acts done in the course of their employment. Any warrant of arrest may be executed by the commissioner, any officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4); 1976, ch. 151, § 1; 2009, ch. 59, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 10, effective June 25, 2013.

16.060.
Powers and duties of commissioner and officers. [Effective January 1, 2023]

It shall be the duty of the commissioner, each officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class to detect and prevent crime, apprehend criminals, maintain law and order throughout the state, to collect, classify and maintain information useful for the detection of crime and the identification, apprehension and conviction of criminals and to enforce the criminal, as well as the motor vehicle and traffic laws of the Commonwealth. To this end the commissioner, each officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class is individually vested with the powers of a peace officer and shall have in all parts of the state the same powers with respect to criminal matters and enforcement of the laws relating thereto as sheriffs, constables granted peace officer powers and police officers in their respective jurisdictions, and shall possess all the immunities and matters of defense now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs, constables granted peace officer powers and police officers in any suit brought against them in consequence of acts done in the course of their employment. Any warrant of arrest may be executed by the commissioner, any officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4); 1976, ch. 151, § 1; 2009, ch. 59, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 10, effective June 25, 2013; 2022 ch. 90, § 3, effective January 1, 2023.

16.062.
Prohibition against requesting or requiring victim of alleged sexual offense to submit to polygraph or other examination — Other prohibitions.

No officer of the Kentucky State Police shall:

As a condition of proceeding with an investigation or prosecution of a case, request or require a victim of an alleged sexual offense to submit to a polygraph examination or any other device designed for the purpose of determining whether a person is telling the truth; or

Charge or threaten to charge the victim of an alleged sexual offense with prosecution for a criminal offense for refusing to submit to a polygraph examination or other device designed for the purpose of determining whether a person is telling the truth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 112, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

16.065.
Additional duties of department.

In addition to the performance of all duties relating to the Department of Kentucky State Police, the department shall perform the following functions:

Security of state facilities located in Frankfort;

Highway enforcement;

Water safety enforcement as provided in KRS Chapter 235; and

Personal protection of a Medal of Honor recipient who:

Is a current Kentucky resident;

Is attending any public event or ceremony occurring within the Commonwealth of Kentucky, to which he or she has received an official written invitation;

Is representing for no reason other than being a recipient of the Medal of Honor; and

Has requested protection, in writing and with a copy of the official invitation, to the department no less than fourteen (14) days prior to the event;

not to exceed six (6) instances of protection per year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 295, § 8, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 343, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 85, § 59, effective June 26, 2007; 2019 ch. 174, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

16.066.
Design and availability of forms relating to purchases of metals and objects containing metal — Charges for copies — Copyright — Use of other facsimiles.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall design the electronic and paper forms utilized in KRS

433.890

(1) and any other forms and instructions necessary to implement KRS

433.890

.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall make the forms and instructions utilized in subsection (1) of this section available on the department’s Internet Web site for downloading by any person.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall make single copies of the forms and instructions utilized in subsection (1) of this section available as public records, at the same rate charged for other public records. The department shall not be required to make multiple copies of the forms or instructions for any person, but may do so at the same rate charged for other public records.

Any person may make copies of the forms and instructions required by subsection (1) of this section and may charge for the copies. No person, other than the Commonwealth, shall apply for a copyright on the forms or instructions provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The Department of Kentucky State Police may, in the name of the Commonwealth, apply for a copyright on the forms and instructions which it produces pursuant to this section.

A purchaser required to generate, maintain, and transmit records pursuant to KRS

433.890

:

May utilize the forms designed by the Department of Kentucky State Police; or

May generate his or her own forms which shall contain at least the information required by KRS

433.890

and which may contain additional information required by a local government or by the purchaser; or

Shall use a form specified by a local government which has adopted an ordinance in accordance with KRS

65.871

provided the form contains at least the information required by KRS 433.890 and which may contain additional information required by the local government.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 83, § 6, effective July 15, 2008.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2008). The Reviser of Statutes has renumbered subsection (5) of the statute under the authority of KRS 7.136(1).

16.068.
Fees for fingerprint impressions or photograph requested for professional, trade, or commercial purposes or personal use.

The Department of Kentucky State Police may charge a fee of ten dollars ($10) per set of fingerprint impressions taken and five dollars ($5) per photograph taken or copied when those services are requested by a person for professional, trade, or commercial purposes or for personal use.

If the actual cost of processing fingerprinting and photograph requests rises above the fee amounts set in this section, the Department of Kentucky State Police may set new fees through administrative regulations.

Nothing in this section shall change any other fee allocation allowed by statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 135, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

16.070.
Uniforms, equipment, and facilities.

The commissioner is the head and chief executive officer of the department. He or she shall provide for himself or herself, each officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, under the provisions of KRS

45A.045

to

45A.650

, such uniforms, equipment, and facilities, including motor vehicles, necessary to the performance of their respective duties, but all uniforms, equipment, and facilities, including motor vehicles, shall remain the property of the Commonwealth. The commissioner may sell through the Finance and Administration Cabinet, under the provisions of KRS

45A.045

to

45A.650

, such uniforms, equipment, and facilities, including motor vehicles, as become unfit for use, and all moneys received therefrom shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to a revolving fund to be used by the department.

The commissioner shall keep an inventory and shall charge against each officer and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class the value of all property of the department issued to him or her, and if it is determined by the commissioner that any loss or destruction of property was due to the carelessness or neglect of an officer or an individual employed as a Trooper R Class, then the value of the property shall be deducted from the pay of the officer or the individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.

By agreement with the commissioner of highways of the Commonwealth, the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police may provide for the leasing of motor vehicles and accessories thereto, radio facilities and equipment, office equipment, and other property or facilities, upon such terms and conditions and for such compensation as said agreement may provide. The commissioner of highways and the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police may further provide, by agreement, for the service and repair at any state garage of motor vehicles or accessories thereto which are owned, operated, or rented by the department, upon such terms and conditions and for such compensation as said agreement may provide. Subject to KRS Chapter 42, the department is authorized, by lease or purchase, to acquire, maintain, and operate motor vehicles, and the officers of said department, including the commissioner and individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, are authorized and empowered to operate such motor vehicles in the course of their duties, and in carrying out the purposes, responsibilities, and functions provided for in KRS

16.010

to

16.170

.

The commissioner shall establish local headquarters so as to best distribute the officers, individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, and employees of the department throughout the various sections of the Commonwealth where they will be most efficient in carrying out the provisions of KRS

16.010

to

16.199

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 7; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. X, § 6; 1966, ch. 255, § 13; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1), Art. IV, § 20(1), Art. V, § 24(3) to 24(6); 1990, ch. 496, § 24, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 85, § 60, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 59, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 11, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2009). A reference in subsection (4) of this statute to “KRS

16.010

to

16.185

and Sections 12 to 15 of this Act” in 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 79, sec. 5, has been changed in codification to “KRS

16.010

to

16.199

,” to account for newly created statutes in 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 75, secs. 1 to 10, and 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 79, secs. 12 to 15, all of which have been assigned numbers in KRS Chapter 16 within that range of statutes.